Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
Churchill Downs Authority

58.500.
Authority created to acquire Churchill Downs — Appointment of members — Terms of office — Compensation — Officers.

A Churchill Downs authority is hereby created, initially consisting of three (3) prominent citizens and residents of Kentucky to be appointed by the Governor, one (1) of whom is an owner and breeder of Thoroughbred horses, and all of whom have no official connection with the government of the Commonwealth or Churchill Downs. The foregoing members shall serve as such until the acquisition of Churchill Downs, its real estate, franchises, rights, privileges and other properties by the authority as an agency of the Commonwealth.

Upon the completion of such acquisition, the then members of the authority shall be replaced by other members thereof as follows: nine (9) persons to be appointed by the Governor, who are residents or owners of real estate located in the Commonwealth and who are of outstanding character, business experience and at least six (6) of whom have knowledge of racing and the affairs of Churchill Downs, and not less than three (3) of whom shall be residents of Jefferson County. The Governor shall initially appoint nine (9) persons having such qualifications, two (2) each for staggered terms ranging from one (1) to four (4) years as he may designate and one (1) person for a term of four (4) years.

As such terms expire, the then remaining members of the authority, by majority vote, shall select and submit to the Governor for his consideration the names of three (3) qualified nominees to fill each vacancy, one (1) of whom may be a member whose term has expired, from which the Governor shall appoint, for a four (4) year term, a member to fill the vacancy.

After all members of the authority appointed as aforesaid have been appointed for a four (4) year term following the expiration of their initial staggered terms, the procedure outlined above shall be continued in filling vacancies of members of the authority as they occur through the expiration of terms.

When and if any member dies, resigns or becomes incapacitated, the then remaining members of the authority, by majority vote, shall select and submit to the Governor for his consideration the names of three (3) qualified nominees to fill such vacancy, from which the Governor shall appoint a member to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term.

The members shall be a body corporate constituting a public corporation, governmental agency and instrumentality of the Commonwealth by the name of “The Churchill Downs Authority” (herein sometimes referred to as the “authority”), with the perpetual succession and with power in that name to contract and be contracted with, to acquire and convey property, sue and be sued, to have and use a corporate seal, and exercise, in addition to the powers and functions specifically stated in KRS

58.500

to

58.590

, all of the usual powers of private corporations to the extent that the same are not inconsistent with specifically enumerated powers or limitations upon public corporations.

The members of the authority shall receive no compensation for their services in that capacity, but shall be entitled to reimbursement for all reasonable expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties.

A majority of the members of the authority shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and in the absence of a quorum, one (1) or more members may adjourn from time to time until a quorum is convened.

From among its members, the authority shall annually elect a chairman and a vice chairman, each to serve for a term of one (1) year and until his successor is elected and accepts his election.

The authority shall elect a president, a secretary and a treasurer, each of whom shall serve for a term of years fixed by contract or an annual term, all terminable for cause deemed sufficient by the authority, and each of whom shall receive such compensation as may be determined by the authority. These officers shall not be members of the authority, but the president and the secretary shall attend all meetings of the authority. The treasurer shall give bond to the authority and the Commonwealth conditioned upon his faithful accounting for all funds coming into his custody from time to time, the same to be in such amount as the authority may prescribe, with corporate surety given by a surety company qualified to do business in the Commonwealth, the premium therefor to be paid by the authority. The authority shall establish and maintain an office at Churchill Downs, and the secretary of the authority shall at all times maintain therein complete records of all of the authority’s actions and proceedings, which shall constitute public records open to inspection at reasonable times.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 111, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

58.510.
Powers of authority.

The authority may:

Purchase Churchill Downs, its real estate, franchises, rights, privileges and other properties, and acquire such additional real estate as may become desirable in connection with the activities of Churchill Downs, and may construct, reconstruct, maintain and repair improvements on Churchill Downs, and operate the same for appropriate purposes, including, but not limited to, holding and conducting race meetings for stake, purse or reward, and providing and operating a pari-mutuel system of wagering in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 230 or as may otherwise be authorized by law.

Lease properties and concessions at Churchill Downs not needed by the authority for its current operations and sell such property as is not needed for the future operation of Churchill Downs at its present site.

Make and enter into such contracts and agreements with the Commonwealth of Kentucky or any federal, city or county government, or other person or corporation, as may be necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under KRS

58.500

to

58.590

.

Employ consulting engineers, attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts, superintendents, managers and such other employees and agents as may be necessary in the judgment of the authority, and fix their compensation.

Receive and accept from the Commonwealth or any of its departments, any federal agency and the city or county, grants for or in aid of the construction or operation of any project, and receive and accept aid or contributions from any source of either money, property, labor or other things of value, to be held, used and applied for the purposes for which such grants and contributions may be made in furtherance of the business of the authority.

Expend any funds provided under the authority of KRS

58.500

to

58.590

in advertising the facilities, services and projects of the authority.

Do all acts necessary and proper to carry out the powers expressly or impliedly granted in KRS

58.500

to

58.590

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 111, § 2, effective June 17, 1978.

58.520.
Development of museum.

If the authority deems it advisable, it may further develop the museum at Churchill Downs and, in connection therewith, establish a facility and devices through which prior Kentucky Derby and other important races run at Churchill Downs may be exhibited to patrons of Churchill Downs during race meetings and to off-season tourist visitors.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 111, § 3, effective June 17, 1978.

58.530.
Use of facilities for events other than horse racing.

The authority may also conduct or permit the conduct of other athletic and entertainment events at Churchill Downs and the use of its facilities in connection therewith, provided such activities or events do not conflict with or impinge upon the proper operation thereof primarily as a racetrack.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 111, § 4, effective June 17, 1978.

58.540.
Power to issue revenue bonds for particular purposes — Interim financing.

The authority may provide for the issuance of revenue bonds to pay all or any part of the cost of the acquisition of the properties of Churchill Downs or expenses incident thereto referred to in KRS

58.510

, or any part thereof or interest therein, and secure the payment thereof by a lien on the properties acquired with the proceeds of the bonds. The bonds shall bear interest at such rate not exceeding ten percent (10%) per annum and shall mature at such time not exceeding fifteen (15) years from their date, as may be provided by the authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the authority, at a price not less than the face amount thereof and accrued interest thereon. The proceeds of the bonds shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the acquisition of Churchill Downs or expenses incident thereto, and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the authority may provide in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture securing the same.

Notwithstanding KRS Chapter 56, the authority, in addition to the revenue bonds originally issued for the acquisition of Churchill Downs or expenses incident thereto as provided for in subsection (1) of this section, may issue revenue bonds payable solely from the charges, revenues, rentals and other funds pledged for their payment, for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of the acquisition of additional property, the reconstruction of improvements or the erection of additional improvements, but such revenue bonds shall be subordinate to the revenue bonds issued for the original acquisition of Churchill Downs or expenses incident thereto.

Notwithstanding KRS Chapter 56, the authority, in addition to the revenue bonds originally issued for the acquisition of Churchill Downs or expenses incident thereto as provided for in subsection (1) of this section, and for the acquisition of additional property, the reconstruction of improvements or the erection of additional improvements provided for in subsection (2) of this section, may issue revenue bonds payable solely from the charges, revenues, rentals and other funds pledged for their payment, for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of further developing the museum at Churchill Downs and establishing a facility for the exhibition of prior Kentucky Derby and other important races held at Churchill Downs as aforesaid, but such revenue bonds shall be subordinate to any then outstanding previously issued revenue bonds.

The authority may agree to or establish any method of interim financing by the authority during the acquisition of additional property, the reconstruction of improvements or the erection of additional improvements hereinbefore provided for and in developing the museum at Churchill Downs and establishing a facility for the exhibition of prior Kentucky Derby and other important races held at Churchill Downs as aforesaid, with borrowed funds from any bank, trust company, or banking institution, such borrowings to be paid from earnings or through the sale of revenue bonds before, during or at completion of such project, but such revenue bonds shall be subordinate to any then outstanding previously issued revenue bonds; and the interest rates, maturities and other provisions shall be such as the authority may at the time of issuance deem to be proper.

If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue, by error of estimates or otherwise, shall be less than the cost for which issued, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of the deficit, and, unless otherwise provided in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture securing the same, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue exceed such cost, the surplus shall be deposited to the credit of the sinking fund for such bonds or any account therein as the authority shall have provided in the proceedings or trust indenture authorizing and securing the bonds.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds have been executed and are available for delivery. The authority may also provide for the replacement of any bonds that become mutilated or are destroyed or lost.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 111, § 5, effective June 17, 1978.

58.550.
Bonds may be issued without any departmental consent — Bond sale not governed by KRS 56.450.

The issuance of revenue bonds by the authority under the provisions of KRS

58.500

to

58.590

need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds. Bonds may be issued under the provisions of KRS

58.500

to

58.590

without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau or agency of the Commonwealth, and without any proceedings or any other conditions or things, except as specifically required by KRS 58.500 to 58.590. The provisions of KRS 58.500 to 58.590 will supersede KRS

56.450

in regard to the sale of revenue bonds by this authority. Utilization may be made by the authority, however, of the provisions of sections of this chapter relating to issuance of revenue bonds for public projects generally in respect to: form, coupons, denominations, place of payment, signing, facsimile signatures, negotiability and method of sale.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 111, § 6, effective June 17, 1978.

58.560.
Bonds not indebtedness of Commonwealth.

Bonds issued by the authority under the provisions of KRS

58.500

to

58.590

are issued on behalf of the Commonwealth but do not constitute a debt of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision thereof, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or of any such political subdivision, but such bonds and the interest thereon shall be payable solely from the funds and security provided therefor under the provisions of KRS

58.500

to

58.590

, and all such bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement to that effect.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 111, § 7, effective June 17, 1978.

58.570.
Bonds may be secured by indenture.

In the discretion of the authority, any bonds issued under the provisions of KRS

58.500

to

58.590

may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company in the Commonwealth. If obtainable, insurance adequate to cover the unpaid amount of outstanding revenue bonds shall be carried on the improvements of Churchill Downs. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust indenture or proceedings may be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of the project.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 111, § 8, effective June 17, 1978.

58.580.
Property of authority is public property — Payment in lieu of taxes to local taxing units — Revenues exempt from taxation.

All projects and other property of the authority are hereby declared to be public property devoted to an essential public and governmental function and purpose, and shall be exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof, provided that the authority shall annually contribute to Louisville, Jefferson County, and the Jefferson County School District an amount equal to the local property taxes Churchill Downs would have paid under private ownership. All bonds or notes issued pursuant to KRS

58.500

to

58.590

are hereby declared to be issued by a body corporate and public of the Commonwealth and for an essential public and governmental purpose and such bonds and notes, and the interest thereon and the income therefrom, and all funds, revenues, income, and other moneys received or to be received by the authority and pledged or available to pay or secure the payment of such bonds or notes, or interest thereon, shall at all times be exempt from taxation except for transfer, inheritance, and estate taxes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 111, § 9, effective June 17, 1978.

58.590.
Annual report to Governor and General Assembly — Annual audit.

By January 30 each year, the authority shall make an annual report of its activities for the preceding calendar year to the Governor and to the General Assembly. Each such report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering its operations during the year. The authority shall provide for an audit of its books and accounts to be made at least once in each year by certified public accountants, and the cost thereof may be treated as a part of the cost of acquisition or operation of the project. Such audits shall be public records within the meaning of KRS

61.870

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 111, § 10, effective June 17, 1978.